Missouri, session 2026, HB2264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.410, to read as follows:
9.410. March sixteenth each year is hereby designated as "Election Judges and
2 Poll Workers Appreciation Day" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged
3 to participate in appropriate events and activities to thank and celebrate the election
4 judges and poll workers who ensure the functioning of our republic.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.